California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(2) The department may consult with individuals or representatives of the agriculture industry, and academic or scientific individuals, or organizations to establish criteria and assist in the recommendation of any expenditure of funds or the award of grants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 414, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

486.

Notwithstanding Section 482, the secretary may not enter into a cooperative agreement with a county of the first class, as defined in Section 28022 of the Government Code, for agricultural inspector services, if the cooperative agreement requires that the county provide year-round services, unless not less than 66 percent of the agricultural inspector aides not afforded protections as permanent employees employed under the cooperative agreement are afforded protections as permanent employees under the county’s civil service or other personnel system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 381, Sec. 1.   (AB 1362)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Food Biotechnology Task Force [491. - 492.]

491.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Consumers have an interest in being informed about the benefits and potential quantifiable risks to their health from products they consume. This information must be grounded in sound science, must use informative and effective communications, and shall be consistent with other production technologies.

(b) As new advances in biotechnology, including transgenic plants, are developed, it is important to understand the opportunities that new technologies offer to consumers, farmers, the livestock industry, food processors, and the environment, as well as to evaluate the potential risks.

(c) Under the existing regulatory framework for biotechnology, the United States Food and Drug Administration has the federal authority to assure that food and pharmaceutical development using biotechnology protects public health, the United States Environmental Protection Agency has the authority to review environmental issues including bioengineered pesticides, and the United States Department of Agriculture has the responsibility to regulate the introduction of genetically modified plants into the agricultural environment. Careful review of existing oversight responsibility helps in understanding the regulatory framework governing the approval of biotechnology products and will help clarify California’s role in the endeavor.

(d) California is the leading agricultural state in the country, producing 350 commodities and farm gate revenues totaling nearly twenty-seven billion dollars ($27,000,000,000) annually, of which nearly seven billion dollars ($7,000,000,000) is exported. Support for agricultural research based in sound science, and the utilization of modern farming technologies is a key factor leading to California’s strong farm economy and its competitive edge in the world market for agricultural products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 589, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

492.

(a) The Legislature hereby creates the Food Biotechnology Task Force. The task force shall be cochaired by the Secretary of California Health and Human Services, and the Secretary of the California Department of Food and Agriculture. The task force shall consult with appropriate state agencies and the University of California. The Department of Food and Agriculture shall be the lead agency.

(b) An advisory committee shall be appointed by the task force to provide input on issues reviewed by the task force. The advisory committee shall consist of representatives from consumer groups, environmental organizations, farmers, ranchers, representatives from the biotechnology industry,
 researchers, organic farmers, food processors, retailers, and others with interests in the issues surrounding biotechnology.

(c) The Department of Food and Agriculture shall make funds available to other agencies to accomplish the purposes of this article and shall contract, where appropriate, with the California Council on Science and Technology, the University of California, or other entities to review issues evaluated by the task force or support activities of the advisory committee.

(d) The task force may request particular agencies to lead the effort to evaluate various factors related to food biotechnology. As funding becomes available, the task force shall evaluate factors including all of the following:

(1) Definition and categorization of food biotechnology and production processes.

(2) Scientific literature on the subject, and a characterization of information resources readily available to consumers.

(3) Issues related to domestic and international marketing of biotechnology foods such as the handling, processing, manufacturing, distribution, labeling, and marketing of these products.

(4) Potential benefits and impacts to human health, the state’s economy, and the environment accruing from food biotechnology.

(5) Existing federal and state evaluation and oversight procedures.

(e) An initial sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund for disbursement to the Department of Food and Agriculture. It is the intent
 of the Legislature to make further funds available to accomplish the purposes contained in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 97, Sec. 2.   (AB 222)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sustainable Agriculture [500. - 501.]

500.

Pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 821, it is the intent of the Legislature that programs at the University of California designed to promote research on, and facilitate adoption of, sustainable agricultural practices, including, but not limited to, research, teaching, and outreach in the areas of sustainable farming systems, biologically integrated farming systems, organic agriculture, small farms, agroecology systems, biointensive integrated pest management, and biological pest control shall be adequately funded through the annual budget process to ensure the programs’ ongoing ability to respond to the needs of all sectors of California’s agricultural industry. It is the further intent of the Legislature that the sustainable agricultural practices, methods, and materials identified and developed by these programs be incorporated into appropriate programs of the state and the university to maximize the access of California farmers and ranchers to the information needed to adopt and implement these measures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

Pursuant to Section 500 and subdivision (d) of Section 821, the Legislature requests that the Regents of the University of California do both of the following:

(a) Provide adequate and ongoing funding to programs at the University of California designed to promote research on, and facilitate adoption of, sustainable agricultural practices, including, but not limited to, research, teaching, and outreach in the areas of sustainable farming systems, biologically integrated farming systems, organic agriculture, small farms, agroecology systems, biointensive integrated pest management, and biological pest control to ensure the programs’ ongoing ability to respond to the needs of all sectors of California’s agricultural industry.

(b) Fully incorporate the sustainable agricultural practices, methods, and materials identified and developed by the programs enumerated in this article into all appropriate programs of the university to ensure that California farmers and ranchers have maximum access to the information needed to adopt and implement these measures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Farmer Equity Act of 2017 [510. - 515.]

510.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Farmer Equity Act of 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   (AB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

511.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California recognizes the importance of investing in the long-term prosperity of our food and farming system, starting with our farmers.

(2) Farmers of color have historically not had equitable access to land and other resources necessary to conduct farming in California, and that legacy of prejudice persists.

(3) Female farmers represent less than a quarter of all farmers in the state. Only 2 percent of California farmers are women of color, according to the United States Department of Agriculture Census of Agriculture.

(4) Socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers tend to farm fewer acres but have a greater diversity of crops in California.

(5) According to the United States Department of Agriculture Census of Agriculture, on average, socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers in California receive less in federal payments than their White counterparts and also earn less.

(6) Despite the barriers, an increasing number of socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers are attempting to farm throughout California,
 across rural and urban settings.

(7) Existing federal agricultural policies have failed to provide sufficient and appropriate technical assistance and financial support, including farmer cooperative creation, for socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers.

(b) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature that the secretary should support socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers and include this support in the department’s vision and its relevant policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   (AB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

512.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Secretary” refers to the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(b) “Socially disadvantaged farmer or rancher” means a farmer or rancher who is a member of a socially disadvantaged group.

(c) “Socially disadvantaged group” means a group whose members have been subjected to racial, ethnic, or gender prejudice because of their identity as members of a group without regard to their individual qualities. These groups include all of the following:

(1) African Americans.

(2) Native Indians.

(3) Alaskan Natives.

(4) Hispanics.

(5) Asian Americans.

(6) Native Hawaiians and Pacific Islanders.

(d) “Urbanized area,” as used by the United States Census Bureau, refers to a population of at least 50,000 people.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   (AB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

513.

(a) The department shall ensure the inclusion of socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers, including socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers in urbanized areas, in the development, adoption, implementation, and enforcement of food and agriculture laws, regulations, and policies and programs.

(b) The secretary shall create a position within the department’s executive office to support the efforts of this section and Section 514. The person appointed to that position shall report to the secretary.

(c) The department shall do all of the following:

(1) Consult with the Secretaries of the California Environmental Protection Agency,
 the Natural Resources Agency, the Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency, and the California Health and Human Services Agency, and all other interested members of the public and private sectors of the state on opportunities for socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers and to coordinate state programs.

(2) Disseminate information regarding opportunities provided by, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Agriculture, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the General Accounting Office, the Office of Management and Budget, and other federal agencies for socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers.

(3) Evaluate boards, committees, commissions, and advisory panels created pursuant to this code for opportunities for inclusion of socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers, except those established pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with
 Section 58841) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 21, Article 7 (commencing with Section 59721) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 21, and Division 22 (commencing with Section 63901).

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 20.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 21 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

513.

(a) The department shall ensure the inclusion of socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers, including socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers in urbanized areas, in the development, adoption, implementation, and enforcement of food and agriculture laws, regulations, and policies and programs.

(b) The secretary shall create a position within the department’s executive office to support the efforts of this section and Section 514. The person appointed to that position shall report to the secretary.

(c) The department shall do all of the following:

(1) Consult with the Secretaries of the California Environmental
 Protection Agency, the Natural Resources Agency, the California Housing and Homelessness Agency, and the California Health and Human Services Agency, and all other interested members of the public and private sectors of the state on opportunities for socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers and to coordinate state programs.

(2) Disseminate information regarding opportunities provided by, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Agriculture, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the General Accounting Office, the Office of Management and Budget, and other federal agencies for socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers.

(3) Evaluate boards, committees, commissions, and advisory panels created pursuant to this code for opportunities for inclusion of socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers, except those established pursuant to Article 8
 (commencing with Section 58841) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 21, Article 7 (commencing with Section 59721) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 21, and Division 22 (commencing with Section 63901).

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 20) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 21.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

514.

(a) On or before January 1, 2020, the department shall submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature on efforts to serve socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers and all female farmers and ranchers in California. The report shall
 include recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature on how to improve processes to include socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers.

(b) The report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   (AB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

515.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Black, Indigenous, and People of Color (BIPOC) Producer Advisory Committee and the Small-Scale Producer Advisory Committee, shall establish the Regional Farmer Equipment and Cooperative Resources Assistance Pilot Program to provide financial and technical assistance to support regional farm equipment sharing and enhance cooperative benefits for socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers and limited resource farmers and ranchers, with preference provided under the program in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 93540 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Activities that are eligible for funding through the program shall
 include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Developing and expanding equipment sharing programs for the purchase and repair of tools, equipment, and infrastructure, and that pay all or a portion of associated administrative costs, to do both of the following:

(A) Support environmentally sustainable farming practices, including, but not limited to, practices that promote soil health, water conservation, wildlife and their habitat, and wildfire resilience.

(B) Enhance regional food and fiber systems for socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers and limited resource farmers and ranchers.

(2) Providing technical assistance and support, including,
 but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Training on the use and maintenance of tools, equipment, and infrastructure.

(B) Outreach to ensure direct and meaningful benefits to socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers and limited resource farmers or ranchers.

(C) Small farm tool demonstrations.

(3) (A) Providing a direct grant to an entity that will assist in cooperative development for farmers.

(B) The entity described in subparagraph (A) shall have relevant cooperative development expertise and shall benefit socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers and limited
 resource farmers or ranchers. For purposes of this subdivision, “relevant cooperative development expertise” means the entity shall have a demonstrated record of experience in the planning, formation, and support of agricultural or rural cooperatives.

(c) Entities eligible for financial assistance under the program shall include, but not be limited to, resource conservation districts, the University of California Cooperative Extension, tribes as defined in Section 90100 of the Public Resources Code, farmer cooperatives, and nonprofit organizations.

(d) An application for financial assistance pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) A
 description of how the applicant will operate an equipment sharing program.

(2) A list and description of the tools, equipment, and infrastructure the applicant will purchase.

(3) A description of the equipment sharing program, including safeguards for the long-term benefits of any tools, equipment, or infrastructure purchased, expected benefits of the equipment sharing program, and the types of farmers or ranchers the applicant aims to serve, including specific outreach that will be provided to socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers and limited resource farmers or ranchers.

(4) A description of how the equipment sharing program will be maintained after the period of the financial assistance expires.

(e) The Farm Equity Advisor at the department shall ensure that the program meets the objectives of this article.

(f) (1) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(A) “Limited resource farmer or rancher” has the same definition as in Section 760.107 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section read on June 17, 2025.

(B) “Program” means the Regional Farmer Equipment and Cooperative Resources Assistance Pilot Program.

(2) For purposes of this section, “financial assistance” does not include a loan.

(g) Subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, shall become operative upon the Legislature making an appropriation for purposes of the program.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 5.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Poultry and Livestock Diagnostic Laboratories [520. - 531.]

520.

“University,” as used in this article, means the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1536, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

521.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the department contract with the Regents of the University of California to operate poultry and livestock disease laboratories pursuant to this article. The central laboratory should be located next to the facilities of the Veterinary Medical Teaching Hospital of the University of California at Davis, in order to take advantage of the expertise of the veterinary specialists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1536, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

522.

When a central diagnostic laboratory constructed on the Davis campus of the university is ready for occupancy, the director shall contract with the Regents of the University of California for its School of Veterinary Medicine to establish and operate the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory. The system shall be headed by a director appointed by the Dean of the School of Veterinary Medicine under applicable university hiring rules. The system shall test, examine, and make diagnoses of infectious, nutritional, toxic, metabolic, and other diseases of domestic animals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 114.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

523.

The contract executed pursuant to this article shall provide that the university maintain sufficient numbers of laboratories to perform the functions contained in this article. The central diagnostic laboratory shall be established on the Davis campus of the university, and branch laboratories shall be operated as long as these services are best performed at a branch laboratory, considering the cost and quality of services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 706, Sec. 3.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

524.

(a) A central diagnostic laboratory building to be constructed on the Davis campus of the university adjacent to the facilities of the Veterinary Medical Teaching Hospital, together with the equipment necessary for a modern veterinary diagnostic laboratory, is hereby specifically authorized. The department may include a request for physical facilities planning and working drawings funds in its 1983–84 budget request and for construction funds in the 1984–85 budget request. The funds may be transferred, as appropriate, to the university for planning, working drawings, and construction. Title to the facility shall vest in the Regents of the University of California, and the facility shall be dedicated for use as a veterinary diagnostic laboratory so long as it is needed for that purpose.

(b) Prior to completion of construction of a central diagnostic laboratory on the Davis campus of the university, the director may continue to provide interim laboratory services and to contract with the university for diagnostic services which can be rendered more effectively by the university. In order to assure the orderly transfer of the veterinary diagnostic program from the department to the university, a Transition Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory Administrative Committee is established. The committee shall consist of the director or his or her designee, who will serve as chairman, the Dean of the School of Veterinary Medicine or his or her designee who will serve as assistant chairman, and two additional members, one appointed by the director and one by the dean. The committee shall advise the department and the university on the operation of the laboratories during the period prior to the diagnostic laboratory system being fully transferred from the department to the university.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1536, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

525.

After the contract has been executed pursuant to Section 521, the diagnostic functions of the regional laboratories maintained at Petaluma and Sacramento shall be transferred to other laboratories in the system and those two laboratories shall be closed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1536, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

526.

The contract shall provide that the university, in consultation with the department, shall establish a schedule of fees to help defray the cost of operation of the laboratories.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1536, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

527.

The contract shall provide for all of the following services which, when included in the department’s budget, shall be provided without charge:

(a) Services performed in the course of a department-approved investigation of an animal health problem.

(b) Department-approved services provided to regulatory agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1536, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

528.

The contract shall specify the accounting procedures to be used and any reports necessary to assure compliance with state and university requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1536, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

529.

It is intended that the contractual arrangement between the university and the department be of long-term duration. The department’s budget for the laboratories shall be reviewed annually.

A Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory Board is hereby established, consisting of representatives of the livestock and poultry industries and practicing veterinarians who utilize the laboratory service. It shall be appointed by the director in consultation with the Dean of the School of Veterinary Medicine. The Chief of the Bureau of Animal Health of the department, the Assistant Area Veterinarian in Charge for California for the United States Department of Agriculture, and the director of the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory created by this article shall be ex officio members. The board shall advise the university and the department on all aspects of the operation of the laboratories.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 115.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

530.

A member of the Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory Board is entitled to be paid his or her actual expenses which are incurred while engaged in performing his or her duties that are authorized by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1536, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

531.

The budget for the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory shall be established as a line item in the budget of the department. The operating budget requests shall be submitted annually, and requests for funding of construction of facilities and special items of laboratory equipment which cost over one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) shall be submitted when required. The director shall transfer funds appropriated for operation of the laboratories, for equipment, and for construction of facilities to the university to be managed according to university rules and regulations, and in accordance with the contract between the department and the university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 116.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Sustainable Agriculture [550. - 555.]

550.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Sustainable Agriculture Research and Education Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 1891)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) There is a growing movement in California and the nation to change farming techniques by adopting more resource-conserving, energy-efficient systems of agriculture. The objective of these changes is to produce agricultural products that may reduce the use of petrochemicals, improve means of biological pest management, improve soil productivity, improve erosion control, and improve irrigation, cultivation, and harvesting techniques.

(b) Over the long term, adoption of more efficient resource-conserving systems of agricultural production can benefit both the producing and consuming public.

(c) The resolution of many agricultural problems depends on immediate efforts to provide farmers with practices that are both resource conserving and economical for food producers, and to foster food production and distribution methods that reduce dependence on petroleum-based inputs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 1891)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

552.

The purpose of this article is to promote more research and education on sustainable agricultural practices, such as organic methods, biological control, and integrated pest managements, including the analysis of economic factors influencing the long-term sustainability of California agriculture. This article is intended to foster economically and ecologically beneficial means of soil improvement, pest management, irrigation, cultivation, harvesting, transportation, and marketing for California agriculture based on methods designed to accomplish all of the following:

(a) The control of pests and diseases of agricultural importance through alternatives that reduce or eliminate the use of pesticides and petrochemicals.

(b) The production, processing, and distribution of food and fiber in ways that consider the interactions among soil, plants, water, air, animals, tillage, machinery, labor, energy, and transportation to enhance agricultural efficiency, public health, and resource conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 1891)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Regents of the University of California establish the Sustainable Agriculture Research and Education Program to support all of the following:

(1) Competitive grants for research on topics described in Section 552.

(2) The giving of instructions and practical demonstrations in agriculture and imparting information through demonstrations, publications, and otherwise, and for printing and distribution of information in connection with the Sustainable Agriculture Research and Education Program. Where feasible, these demonstrations shall include field research conducted on cooperating farms.

(3) Planning for and management of University of California farmlands committed to supporting long-term continuous research in sustainable agricultural practices and farming systems.

(b) Those eligible to apply for competitive grants under subdivision (a) shall include individuals affiliated with public and private institutions of higher education and with nonprofit tax-exempt organizations.

(c) All grant applications shall be subject to peer review for scientific merit.

(d) In awarding grants, preference shall be given to projects that include field evaluation and offer the greatest potential for measurable progress toward attaining the long-term goals pursuant to Section 552.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 1891)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

(a) If the Sustainable Agriculture Research and Education Program is established by the regents, the President of the University of California shall establish and appoint a Program Advisory Committee and a Technical Advisory Committee.

(b) The duties of the Program Advisory Committee shall include recommending goals and priorities for this program, including, but not limited to, reviewing the priority of grant applications.

(c) The Program Advisory Committee shall be composed of a majority of individuals representing agriculture, as well as representatives from government, public organizations, and institutions of higher education, all of
 whom are knowledgeable regarding the issues and practices of sustainable agriculture.

(d) The duties of the Technical Advisory Committee shall include making recommendations about the scientific merit of grant applications submitted pursuant to Section 553.

(e) The Technical Advisory Committee shall be composed of faculty and staff of the University of California and other experts from outside the university.

(f) Members of the Program Advisory Committee and Technical Advisory Committee who are not employed by the University of California shall be appointed for a period not exceeding three years and receive compensation for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties according to applicable university regulations and guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 1891)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

555.

If the Sustainable Agriculture Research and Education Program is established by the regents, it shall be established from existing resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 1891)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. The Cannella Environmental Farming Act of 1995 [560. - 570.]

560.

This article shall be known as the Cannella Environmental Farming Act of 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 928, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

561.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) California agriculture helps to feed the world and fuel our economy. Agriculture provides one out of every 10 jobs in California, and our state has led the nation in total farm production every year since 1948. During 1993, California’s 76,000 farms generated nearly $20 billion in cash receipts and another $70 billion in economic activity.

(b) Many farmers engage in practices that contribute to the well-being of ecosystems, air quality, and wildlife and their habitat. Agriculture plays a pivotal role in preserving open space that is vital to the environment. Seventy-five percent of the nation’s wildlife live on farms and ranches. Freshwater streams and stockponds on farms and ranches provide habitat to millions of fish. Corn, wheat, rice, and other field crops provide bountiful food and habitat for deer, antelope, ducks, geese, and other wildlife.

(c) Environmental laws should be based on the best scientific evidence gathered from public and private sources.

(d) Best scientific evidence should include the net environmental impact provided by agriculture.

(e) Additional research is necessary to adequately inventory the impact that agriculture has on the environment. Recognition should be afforded to agricultural activities that produce a net benefit for the environment, which is consistent with the growing trend of providing incentives for the private sector to undertake economic activities that benefit the environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 928, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

564.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Agricultural activities” means those activities that generate products as specified in Section 54004.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(c) “Panel” means the Scientific Advisory Panel on Resilient and Sustainable Agriculture.

(d) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 283, Sec. 1.   (AB 947)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

566.

(a) The department shall establish and oversee a sustainable agriculture program. The program shall provide research, technical assistance, and incentive grants to promote agricultural practices that support climate resilience for farms and ranches and the well-being of ecosystems, air quality, and biodiversity.

(b) The department may assist in the compilation and synthesis of scientific evidence from public and private sources, including the scientific community, industry, conservation organizations, and federal, state, and local agencies identifying the net environmental impacts and opportunities that agriculture creates for achieving sustainability goals. The department shall serve as the repository of this information and provide it to federal, state, and local
 governments, as needed.

(c) The department shall conduct the activities specified in this article with existing resources, including recurring funding and one-time administrative funds, to the extent they are available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 283, Sec. 2.   (AB 947)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

568.

(a) The secretary shall convene an 11-member Scientific Advisory Panel on Resilient and Sustainable Agriculture to advise the secretary on the implementation of research, incentive, and technical assistance grant programs for sustainable agriculture, and to assist federal, state, and local government agencies, as appropriate or necessary, on issues relating to the impact of agricultural practices on the climate, air, water, and biodiversity to do the following:

(1) Review data and compile the best available science on the impact that agriculture has on the environment and local communities and recommend to the secretary and appropriate state agencies the best available science on environmental impacts of agriculture, and practices and policies based on that
 information to advance the goals of this article, including Section 569.

(2) Research, review, and comment on data upon which proposed environmental policies and regulatory programs are based to ensure that the environmental impacts of agricultural activities are accurately portrayed and to identify incentives that may be provided to encourage agricultural practices with environmental benefits.

(3) Assist government agencies to incorporate policies and practices identified pursuant to paragraph (1) into environmental regulatory programs.

(b) (1) The panel shall consist of members of the public that represent scientific expertise in sustainable agriculture and members of state agencies that represent expertise in programs and policies related to agriculture. Of the members first appointed to the
 panel, two shall serve for a term of two years and three shall serve for a term of three years, as determined by lot. Thereafter, members shall be appointed for a term of three years, limited to two terms. The members shall be appointed as follows:

(A) Seven members shall be appointed by the secretary as follows:

(i) Four members shall have a minimum of five years of scientific training and experience in the field of agriculture, of which at least one member shall have training and field experience in on-farm management practices that reduce greenhouse gas emissions, sequester carbon, or both.

(ii) Two members shall be producers, of which at least one member shall be certified as a producer pursuant to federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.).

(iii) At least one member shall have technical expertise in agricultural conservation planning and management.

(B) Two members shall be appointed by the Secretary for Environmental Protection. One shall have a minimum of five years of training and experience in the field of human health or environmental science, and one shall have expertise in greenhouse gas emissions reductions practices related to agriculture.
